src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_KOHELO
!!  The o final trisyllabic stems are in class {{@LEXNAME@}}, and the old
!!  dictionaries used ². 
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 2 o
!!€  tohelo: tohelo+A+Sg+Nom # clumsy
!!€  toheloita: tohelo+A+Pl+Par
!!€  toheloja: tohelo+A+Pl+Par
!!€  tohelojen: tohelo+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  toheloiden: tohelo+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  toheloitten: tohelo+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  tohelompi: tohelo+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  toheloin: tohelo+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_LÖPERÖ
!!  And the trisyllabic ö stem is classified {{@LEXNAME@}}.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 2 ö
!!€  löperö: löperö+A+Sg+Nom # sloppy
!!€  löperöjen: löperö+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  löperöiden: löperö+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  löperöitten: löperö+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  löperömpi: löperö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  löperöin: löperö+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !Unchanging long vowel stems
!!  The words with stem vowels o, u, y and ö preceded by vowels still have no
!!  stem variation, but use yet another pattern of allomorphs for
!!  singular and plural partitives and plural genitive

LEXICON ADJ_AUTIO
!!  The class for o final long vowel stems is {{@LEXNAME@}}, and old
!!  old dictionaries used ³. 
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 3 o
!!€  autio: autio+A+Sg+Nom # deserted
!!€  autiota: autio+A+Sg+Par
!!$  autioa: autio+A+Sg+Par
!!€  autioita: autio+A+Pl+Par
!!€  autioiden: autio+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  autioitten: autio+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  autiompi: autio+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  autioin: autio+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_RIIVIÖ
!!  The front voweled stems with ö after vowels go to class {{@LEXNAME@}},
!!  and used the old dictionary class ³.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 3 ö
!!€  riiviö: riiviö+A+Sg+Nom # nasty
!!€  riiviötä: riiviö+A+Sg+Par
!!€  riiviöiden: riiviö+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  riiviöitten: riiviö+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  riiviömpi: riiviö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  riiviöin: riiviö+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no examples of new loan word adjectives ending in long vowel
!!  Furthermore there are no examples of adjectives in other classes without
!!  stem variation yet. There are some examples of these in nouns if you need
!!  new classes at some point.

!!  The abovementioned o, u, y and ö stems as well as new e stems can all
!!  form combinations with gradation feature as well. Not all combinations are
!!  yet found for adjectives, for full reference, read the noun classes.

LEXICON ADJ_KOLKKO
!!  The quantitative k gradations with o bisyllabic o stem use class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, and old dictionaries use classes ¹⁻A and ¹⁻D.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 k~0 o
!!€  kolkko: kolkko+A+Sg+Nom # gloomy
!!€  kolkossa: kolkko+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  kolkoista: kolkko+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  kolkkoihin: kolkko+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  kolkompi: kolkko+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  kolkoin: kolkko+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_VIRKKU
!!  The quantitative k gradations with u bisyllabic o stem use class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, and old dictionaries use classes ¹⁻A and ¹⁻D.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 k~0 u
!!€  virkku: virkku+A+Sg+Nom # ???
!!€  virkussa: virkku+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  virkuista: virkku+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  virkkuihin: virkku+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  virkumpi: virkku+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  virkuin: virkku+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ku  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ku  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ku  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ku  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ku  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0:ku  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ku  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ku  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_SÄIKKY
!!  The quantitative k gradations with y bisyllabic o stem use class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, and old dictionaries use classes ¹⁻A and ¹⁻D.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 k~0 y
!!€  säikky: säikky+A+Sg+Nom # ???
!!€  säikyssä: säikky+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  säikyistä: säikky+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  säikkyihin: säikky+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  säikympi: säikky+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  säikyin: säikky+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ky  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ky  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:y  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ky  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:y  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ky  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ky  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN  ;
0:ky  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:ky  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ky  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:y  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:y  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_KÖKKÖ
!!  The quantitative k gradations with o bisyllabic ö stem use class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, and old dictionaries use classes ¹⁻A and ¹⁻D.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 k~0 ö
!!€  kökkö: kökkö+A+Sg+Nom # ???
!!€  kökössä: kökkö+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  kököistä: kökkö+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  kökköihin: kökkö+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  kökömpi: kökkö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  kököin: kökkö+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  there is no unvarying e final adjective with _k ~ 0_ gradation.

LEXICON ADJ_SUIPPO
!!  The quantitative gradation of p before o is in class {{@LEXNAME@}} and
!!  old dictionaries would use ¹⁻B.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 p~0 o
!!€  suippo: suippo+A+Sg+Nom # ?
!!€  suipossa: suippo+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  suipoista: suippo+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  suippoihin: suippo+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  suipompi: suippo+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  suipoin: suippo+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:po  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;
